Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 1631, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1631. As used in this act, the following terms shall
have these meanings unless the context shall otherwise require:
1. "Affiliate of" or person "affiliated with" a specific person
means a person that directly, or indirectly through one or more
intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common
control with, the person specified;

2. "Commissioner" means the Insurance Commissioner of the State
of Oklahoma, the Commissioner's deputies, or the Insurance
Department, as appropriate;
3. "Control" includes the terms "controlling", "controlled by"
and "under common control with" and means the possession, direct or
indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the
management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership
of voting securities, by contract other than a commercial contract
for goods or nonmanagement services, or otherwise, unless the power
is the result of an official position or corporate office held by
the person. Control shall be presumed to exist if any person,
directly or indirectly, owns, controls, holds with the power to
vote, or holds proxies representing, ten percent (10%) or more of
the voting securities of any other person. This presumption may be
rebutted by a showing made in the manner provided by subsection K of
Section 5 1635 of this act title that control does not exist in
fact. The Commissioner may determine, after furnishing all persons
in interest notice and opportunity to be heard and making specific
findings of fact to support the determination that control exists in
fact, notwithstanding the absence of a presumption to that effect;
4. "Group-wide supervisor" means the regulatory official
authorized to engage in conducting and coordinating group-wide
supervision activities who is determined or acknowledged by the
Commissioner under Section 9 1639 of this act title to have
sufficient significant contacts with the internationally active
insurance group;
5. "Group Capital Calculation Instructions" means the group
capital calculation instructions as adopted by the NAIC and as
amended by the NAIC from time to time in accordance with the
procedures adopted by the NAIC;
6. "Insurance holding company system" means an insurance
holding company system consisting of two or more affiliated persons,
one or more of which is an insurer;
6. 7. "Insurer" has the same meaning as set forth in Section
103 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes, except that it shall not
include agencies, authorities or instrumentalities of the United
States, its possessions and territories, the Commonwealth of Puerto
Rico, the District of Columbia, or a state or political subdivision
of a state;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 2

7. 8. "Internationally active insurance group" means an
insurance holding company system that:
a. includes an insurer registered under Section 5 1635 of
this act title, and
b. meets the following criteria:
(1) premiums written in at least three countries,
(2) the percentage of gross premiums written outside
the United States is at least ten percent (10%)
of the insurance holding company system's total
gross written premiums, and
(3) based on a three-year rolling average, the total
assets of the insurance holding company system
are at least Fifty Billion Dollars
($50,000,000,000.00) or the total gross written
premiums of the insurance holding company system
are at least Ten Billion Dollars
($10,000,000,000.00);
8. 9. "Enterprise risk" means any activity, circumstance, event
or series of events involving one or more affiliates of an insurer
that, if not remedied promptly, is likely to have a material adverse
effect upon the financial condition or liquidity of the insurer or
its insurance holding company system as a whole, including, but not
limited to, anything that would cause the insurer's risk-based
capital to fall into company action level as set forth in the Risk-
based Capital for Insurers Act provided in Sections 1521 through
1533 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statues Statutes, or would cause
the insurer to be in hazardous financial condition pursuant to rules
promulgated by the Insurance Department;
9. 10. "NAIC" means the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners;
11. "NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework" means a separate
NAIC publication which includes a history of the NAIC's development
of regulatory Liquidity Stress Testing, the Scope Criteria
applicable for a specific data year, and the Liquidity Stress Test
instructions and reporting templates for a specific data year, such
Scope Criteria, instructions and reporting template being as adopted
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 3

by the NAIC and as amended by the NAIC from time to time in
accordance with the procedures adopted by the NAIC;
12. "Person" means an individual, a corporation, a limited
liability company, a partnership, an association, a joint stock
company, a trust, an unincorporated organization, any similar entity
or any combination of the foregoing acting in concert, but shall not
include any joint venture partnership exclusively engaged in owning,
managing, leasing or developing real or tangible personal property;
10. 13. "Scope Criteria" means, as detailed in the NAIC
Liquidity Stress Framework, the designated exposure bases along with
minimum magnitudes thereof for the specified data year, used to
establish a preliminary list of insurers considered scoped into the
NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework for that data year;
14. "Securityholder" of a specified person means one who owns
any security of such person, including common stock, preferred
stock, debt obligations and any other security convertible into or
evidencing the right to acquire any of the foregoing;
11. 15. "Subsidiary" of a specified person means an affiliate
controlled by such person directly or indirectly through one or more
intermediaries; and
12. 16. "Voting security" means any security convertible into
or evidencing a right to acquire a voting security.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 1635, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1635. A. Every insurer which is authorized to do
business in this state and which is a member of an insurance holding
company system shall register with the Insurance Commissioner,
except a foreign insurer subject to registration requirements and
standards adopted by statute or regulation in the jurisdiction of
its domicile which are substantially similar to those contained in:
1. This section;
2. Paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 6 1636 of this act
title and subsections B and D of Section 6 1636 of this act title;
and
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 4

3. Either paragraph 2 of subsection A of Section 6 1636 of this
act title or a provision such as the following: Each registered
insurer shall keep current the information required to be disclosed
in its registration statement by reporting all material changes or
additions within fifteen (15) days after the end of the month in
which it learns of each change or addition; provided, however, that
subject to subsection B of Section 6 1636 of this act title, each
registered insurer shall so report all dividends and other
distributions to shareholders within two (2) business days following
the declaration thereof.
Any insurer which is subject to registration under this section
shall register within fifteen (15) days after it becomes subject to
registration, and annually thereafter by May 1 of each year for the
previous calendar year, unless the Commissioner for good cause shown
extends the time for registration, and then within the extended
time. The Commissioner may require any insurer authorized to do
business in the state which is a member of an insurance holding
company system, and which is not subject to registration under this
section, to furnish a copy of the registration statement, the
summary specified in subsection C of this section or other
information filed by the insurance company with the insurance
regulatory authority of its domiciliary jurisdiction.
B. Every insurer subject to registration shall file the
registration statement with the Commissioner on a form and in a
format prescribed by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners (NAIC), which shall contain the following current
information:
1. The capital structure, general financial condition,
ownership and management of the insurer and any person controlling
the insurer;
2. The identity and relationship of every member of the
insurance holding company system;
3. The following agreements in force, and transactions
currently outstanding or which have occurred during the last
calendar year between the insurer and its affiliates:
a. loans, other investments, or purchases, sales or
exchanges of securities of the affiliates by the
insurer or of the insurer by its affiliates,
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 5

b. purchases, sales or exchange of assets,
c. transactions not in the ordinary course of business,
d. guarantees or undertakings for the benefit of an
affiliate which result in an actual contingent
exposure of the insurer's assets to liability, other
than insurance contracts entered into in the ordinary
course of the insurer's business,
e. all management agreements, service contracts and all
cost-sharing arrangements,
f. reinsurance agreements,
g. dividends and other distributions to shareholders, and
h. consolidated tax allocation agreements;
4. Any pledge of the insurer's stock, including stock of any
subsidiary or controlling affiliate, for a loan made to any member
of the insurance holding company system;
5. If requested by the Commissioner, the insurer shall include
financial statements of or within an insurance holding company
system, including all affiliates. Financial statements may include
but are not limited to annual audited financial statements filed
with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) pursuant to
the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934, as amended. An insurer required to file financial
statements pursuant to this paragraph may satisfy the request by
providing the Commissioner with the most recently filed parent
corporation financial statements that have been filed with the SEC;
6. Other matters concerning transactions between registered
insurers and any affiliates as may be included from time to time in
any registration forms adopted or approved by the Commissioner;
7. Statements that the insurer's board of directors oversees
corporate governance and internal controls and that the insurer's
officers or senior management have approved, implemented and
continue to maintain and monitor corporate governance and internal
control procedures; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 6

8. Any other information required by the Commissioner by rule
or regulation.
C. All registration statements shall contain a summary
outlining all items in the current registration statement
representing changes from the prior registration statement.
D. No information need be disclosed on the registration
statement filed pursuant to subsection B of this section if the
information is not material for the purposes of this section.
Unless the Commissioner by rule, regulation or order provides
otherwise, sales, purchases, exchanges, loans or extensions of
credit, investments, or guarantees involving one-half of one percent
(.5%) or less of an insurer's admitted assets as of December 31 next
preceding shall not be deemed material for purposes of this section.
The definition of materiality provided in this subsection shall not
apply for purposes of the Group Capital Calculation Instructions or
the Liquidity Stress Test Framework.
E. Subject to subsection B of Section 6 1636 of this act title,
each registered insurer shall report to the Commissioner all
dividends and other distributions to shareholders within fifteen
(15) business days following the declaration thereof.
F. Any person within an insurance holding company system
subject to registration shall be required to provide complete and
accurate information to an insurer, where the information is
reasonably necessary to enable the insurer to comply with the
provisions of this act.
G. The Commissioner shall terminate the registration of any
insurer which demonstrates that it no longer is a member of an
insurance holding company system.
H. The Commissioner may require or allow two or more affiliated
insurers subject to registration to file a consolidated registration
statement.
I. The Commissioner may allow an insurer which is authorized to
do business in this state and which is part of an insurance holding
company system to register on behalf of any affiliated insurer which
is required to register under subsection A of this section and to
file all information and material required to be filed under this
section.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 7

J. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any
insurer, information or transaction if and to the extent that the
Commissioner by rule, regulation or order shall exempt the same from
the provisions of this section.
K. Any person may file with the Commissioner a disclaimer of
affiliation with any authorized insurer or a disclaimer may be filed
by the insurer or any member of an insurance holding company system.
The disclaimer shall fully disclose all material relationships and
bases for affiliation between the person and the insurer as well as
the basis for disclaiming the affiliation. A disclaimer of
affiliation shall be deemed to have been granted unless the
Commissioner, within thirty (30) days following receipt of a
complete disclaimer, notifies the filing party the disclaimer is
disallowed. In the event of disallowance, the disclaiming party may
request an administrative hearing, which shall be granted. The
disclaiming party shall be relieved of its duty to register under
this section if approval of the disclaimer has been granted by the
Commissioner, or if the disclaimer is deemed to have been approved.
L. 1. The ultimate controlling person of every insurer subject
to registration shall also file an annual enterprise risk report.
The report shall, to the best of the ultimate controlling person's
knowledge and belief, identify the material risks within the
insurance holding company system that could pose enterprise risk to
the insurer. The report shall be filed with the lead state
Commissioner of the insurance holding company system as determined
by the procedures within the Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by
the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.
2. Except as provided below, the ultimate controlling person of
every insurer subject to registration shall concurrently file with
the registration an annual group capital calculation as directed by
the lead state Commissioner. The report shall be completed in
accordance with the NAIC Group Capital Calculation Instructions,
which may permit the lead state Commissioner to allow a controlling
person that is not the ultimate controlling person to file the group
capital calculation. The report shall be filed with the lead state
Commissioner of the insurance holding company system as determined
by the commissioner in accordance with the procedures within the
Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by the NAIC. Insurance holding
company systems described below are exempt from filing the group
capital calculation:
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 8

a. an insurance holding company system that has only one
insurer within its holding company structure, that
only writes business in its domestic state, and
assumes no business from any other insurer,
b. an insurance holding company system that is required
to perform a group capital calculation specified by
the United States Federal Reserve Board. The lead
state Commissioner shall request the calculation from
the Federal Reserve Board under the terms of
information sharing agreements in effect. If the
Federal Reserve Board cannot share the calculation
with the lead state Commissioner, the insurance
holding company system is not exempt from the group
capital calculation filing,
c. an insurance holding company system whose non-United
States group-wide supervisor is located within a
reciprocal jurisdiction as described in Section 5122
of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes that recognizes
the United States state regulatory approach to group
supervision and group capital,
d. an insurance holding company system:
(1) that provides information to the lead state that
meets the requirements for accreditation under
the NAIC financial standards and accreditation
program, either directly or indirectly through
the group-wide supervisor, who has determined
such information is satisfactory to allow the
lead state to comply with the NAIC group
supervision approach, as detailed in the NAIC
Financial Analysis Handbook, and
(2) whose non-United States group-wide supervisor
that is not in a reciprocal jurisdiction
recognizes and accepts, as specified by the
commissioner in regulation, the group capital
calculation as the world-wide group capital
assessment for United States insurance groups who
operate in that jurisdiction,
e. notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraphs c and
d of paragraph 2 of subsection L of this section, a
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 9

lead state Commissioner shall require the group
capital calculation for U.S. operations of any non-
United States-based insurance holding company system
where, after any necessary consultation with other
supervisors or officials, it is deemed appropriate by
the lead state Commissioner for prudential oversight
and solvency monitoring purposes or for ensuring the
competitiveness of the insurance marketplace,
f. notwithstanding the exemptions from filing the group
capital calculation stated in subparagraphs a through
d of paragraph 2 of subsection L of this section, the
lead state Commissioner has the discretion to exempt
the ultimate controlling person from filing the annual
group capital calculation or to accept a limited group
capital filing or report in accordance with criteria
as specified by the commissioner in regulation, and
g. if the lead state Commissioner determines that an
insurance holding company system no longer meets one
or more of the requirements for an exemption from
filing the group capital calculation under this
section, the insurance holding company system shall
file the group capital calculation at the next annual
filing date unless given an extension by the lead
state Commissioner based on reasonable grounds shown;
3. The ultimate controlling person of every insurer subject to
registration and also scoped into the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test
Framework shall file the results of a specific year's Liquidity
Stress Test. The filing shall be made to the lead state insurance
commissioner of the insurance holding company system as determined
by the procedures within the Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by
the NAIC:
a. the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework includes
Scope Criteria applicable to a specific data year.
These Scope Criteria are reviewed at least annually by
the Financial Stability Task Force or its successor.
Any change to the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework
or to the data year for which the Scope Criteria are
to be measured shall be effective on January 1 of the
year following the calendar year when such changes are
adopted. Insurers meeting at least one threshold of
the Scope Criteria are considered scoped into the NAIC
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 10

Liquidity Stress Test Framework for the specified data
year unless the lead state insurance commissioner, in
consultation with the NAIC Financial Stability Task
Force or its successor, determines the insurer should
not be scoped into the Framework for that data year.
Similarly, insurers that do not trigger at least one
threshold of the Scope Criteria are considered scoped
out of the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework for
the specified data year, unless the lead state
insurance commissioner, in consultation with the NAIC
Financial Stability Task Force or its successor,
determines the insurer should be scoped into the
Framework for that data year. Regulators wish to
avoid having insurers scoped in and out of the NAIC
Liquidity Stress Test Framework on a frequent basis.
The lead state insurance commissioner, in consultation
with the Financial Stability Task Force or its
successor, will assess this concern as part of the
determination for an insurer, and
b. the performance of, and filing of the results from, a
specific year's Liquidity Stress Test shall comply
with the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework's
instructions and reporting templates for that year and
any lead state insurance commissioner determinations,
in consultation with the Financial Stability Task
Force or its successor, provided within the Framework.
M. The failure to file a registration statement or any summary
of the registration statement or enterprise risk filing required by
this section within the time specified for filing shall be a
violation of this section.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 1640, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1640. A. Documents, materials or other information in
the possession or control of the Insurance Department that are
obtained by or disclosed to the Commissioner or any other person in
the course of an examination or investigation made pursuant to
Section 7 1637 of this act title and all information reported or
provided to the Insurance Department pursuant to paragraphs 12 and
13 of subsection B of Section 3 1633 of this act title, Section 5
1635 of this act title, Section 6 1636 of this act title, and
Section 11 1639 of this act title are recognized by this state as
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 11

being proprietary and containing trade secrets and shall be
confidential by law and privileged, shall not be subject to open
records, or freedom of information, shall not be subject to
subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in
evidence in any private civil action. However, the Commissioner is
authorized to use the documents, materials or other information in
the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as a part
of the Commissioner's official duties. The Commissioner shall not
otherwise make the documents, materials or other information public
without the prior written consent of the insurer to which it
pertains unless the Commissioner, after giving the insurer and its
affiliates who would be affected thereby notice and opportunity to
be heard, determines that the interest of policyholders,
shareholders or the public will be served by the publication
thereof, in which event the Commissioner may publish all or any part
in such manner as may be deemed appropriate.
1. For purposes of the information reported and provided to the
Department of Insurance pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection L of
Section 1635 of this title, the Commissioner shall maintain the
confidentiality of the group capital calculation and group capital
ratio produced within the calculation and any group capital
information received from an insurance holding company supervised by
the Federal Reserve Board or any United States group wide
supervisor; and
2. For purposes of the information reported and provided to the
Department of Insurance pursuant to paragraph 3 of subsection L of
Section 1635 of this title, the Commissioner shall maintain the
confidentiality of the Liquidity Stress Test results and supporting
disclosures and any Liquidity Stress Test information received from
an insurance holding company supervised by the Federal Reserve Board
and non-United-States group wide supervisors.
B. Neither the Commissioner nor any person who received
documents, materials or other information while acting under the
authority of the Commissioner or with whom such documents, materials
or other information are shared pursuant to this act shall be
permitted or required to testify in any private civil action
concerning any confidential documents, materials or information
subject to subsection A of this section.
C. In order to assist in the performance of the Commissioner's
duties, the Commissioner:
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 12

1. May share documents, materials or other information,
including the confidential and privileged documents, materials or
information subject to subsection A of this section, including
proprietary and trade secret documents and materials, with other
state, federal and international regulatory agencies, with the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) and its
affiliates and subsidiaries, with any third-party consultants
designated by the Commissioner, and with state, federal and
international law enforcement authorities, including members of any
supervisory college described in Section 8 1638 of this act title,
provided that the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the
confidentiality and privileged status of the document, material or
other information, and has verified in writing the legal authority
to maintain confidentiality;
2. Notwithstanding paragraph 1 of this subsection, may only
share confidential and privileged documents, material or information
reported pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection L of Section 5 1635
of this act title with Commissioners of states having statutes or
regulations substantially similar to subsection A of this section
and who have agreed in writing not to disclose such information;
3. May receive documents, materials or information, including
otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials or
information, including proprietary and trade-secret information,
from the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries and from
regulatory and law enforcement officials of other foreign or
domestic jurisdictions, and shall maintain as confidential or
privileged any document, material or information received with
notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged
under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the
document, material or information; and
4. Shall enter into written agreements with the NAIC and any
third-party consultant designated by the Commissioner governing
sharing and use of information provided pursuant to this act
consistent with this subsection that shall:
a. specify procedures and protocols regarding the
confidentiality and security of information shared
with the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries or a
third-party consultant designated by the Commissioner
pursuant to this act, including procedures and
protocols for sharing by the NAIC with other state,
federal or international regulators. The agreement
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 13

shall provide that the recipient agrees in writing to
maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of
the documents, materials or other information and has
verified in writing the legal authority to maintain
such confidentiality,
b. specify that ownership of information shared with the
NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries or a third-
party consultant pursuant to this act remains with the
Commissioner and the NAIC's or a third-party
consultant's, as designated by the Commissioner, use
of the information is subject to the direction of the
Commissioner,
c. excluding documents, material or information reported
pursuant to paragraph 3 of subsection L of Section
1635 of this title, prohibit the NAIC or third-party
consultant designated by the Commissioner from storing
the information shared pursuant to this act in a
permanent database after the underlying analysis is
completed,
d. require prompt notice to be given to an insurer whose
confidential information in the possession of the NAIC
or a third-party consultant designated by the
Commissioner pursuant to this act is subject to a
request or subpoena to the NAIC or a third-party
consultant designated by the Commissioner for
disclosure or production, and
d.
e. require the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries
or a third-party consultant designated by the
Commissioner to consent to intervention by an insurer
in any judicial or administrative action in which the
NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries or a third-
party consultant designated by the Commissioner may be
required to disclose confidential information about
the insurer shared with the NAIC and its affiliates
and subsidiaries or a third-party consultant
designated by the Commissioner pursuant to this act.
f. for documents, material or information reported
pursuant to paragraph 3 of subsection L of Section
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 14

1635 of this title, in the case of an agreement
involving a third-party consultant, provide for
notification of the identity of the consultant to the
applicable insurers.
D. The sharing of information by the Commissioner pursuant to
this act shall not constitute a delegation of regulatory authority
or rulemaking, and the Commissioner is solely responsible for the
administration, execution and enforcement of the provisions of this
act.
E. No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of
confidentiality in the documents, materials or information shall
occur as a result of disclosure to the Commissioner under this
section or as a result of sharing as authorized in subsection C of
this section.
F. Documents, materials or other information in the possession
or control of the NAIC or a third-party consultant designated by the
Commissioner pursuant to this act shall be confidential by law and
privileged, shall not be subject to open records or freedom of
information, shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be
subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil
action.
G. The group capital calculation and resulting group capital
ratio required under paragraph 2 of subsection L of Section 1635 of
this title and the Liquidity Stress Test along with its results and
supporting disclosures required under paragraph 3 of subsection L of
Section 1635 of this title are regulatory tools for assessing group
risks and capital adequacy and group liquidity risks, respectively,
and are not intended as a means to rank insurers or insurance
holding company systems generally. Therefore, except as otherwise
may be required under the provisions of this title, the making,
publishing, disseminating, circulating or placing before the public,
or causing directly or indirectly to be made, published,
disseminated, circulated or placed before the public in a newspaper,
magazine or other publication, or in the form of a notice, circular,
pamphlet, letter or poster, or over any radio or television station
or any electronic means of communication available to the public, or
in any other way as an advertisement, announcement or statement
containing a representation or statement with regard to the group
capital calculation, group capital ratio, the Liquidity Stress Test
results, or supporting disclosures for the Liquidity Stress Test of
any insurer or any insurer group, or of any component derived in the
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 15

calculation by an insurer, broker, or other person engaged in any
manner in the insurance business would be misleading and is
therefore prohibited; provided however, that if any materially false
statement with respect to the group capital calculation, resulting
group capital ratio, an inappropriate comparison of any amount to an
insurer's or insurance group's group capital calculation or
resulting group capital ratio, Liquidity Stress Test result,
supporting disclosures for the Liquidity Stress Test, or an
inappropriate comparison of any amount to an insurer's or insurance
group's Liquidity Stress Test result or supporting disclosures is
published in any written publication and the insurer is able to
demonstrate to the Commissioner with substantial proof the falsity
of such statement or the inappropriateness, as the case may be, then
the insurer may publish announcements in a written publication if
the sole purpose of the announcement is to rebut the materially
false statement.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 16

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 8th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 17

ENR. H. B. NO. 1497 Page 18